Utah statutes.
17B-1-611.   Continuing authority of governing body.

After the conclusion of the public hearing, the board of trustees:

(1)  may:

(a)  continue to review the tentative budget;

(b)  insert any new items; or

(c)  increase or decrease items of expenditure that were the proper subject of consideration at the public hearing;

(2)  may not decrease the amount appropriated for debt retirement and interest or reduction of any existing deficits, as provided by Section 17B-1-613; and

(3)  shall increase or decrease the total anticipated revenue to equal the net change in proposed expenditures in the budget of each fund.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

